en: halved, halves
bg: наполовина
ca: meitat, meitats, meitats de
cs: půlený, půlená, půlené
de: halbiert, halbierte, halbierter, halbiertes, halbe
fr: demi
hr: polovice
pl: połówki
pt: metade, metades

fr: quartiers
nl: kwarten
pl: ćwiartki

en: pieces
af: stukkies
bg: парчета, парченца, парченца от
ca: peça, peces, trossos de, trossos d', guarnició
de: stücke, stücken, stückchen, gestückelt, stück
es: trozo, troza, trozos, trozas, guarnición
fr: morceaux, pièces de, en morceaux, morceaux de, morceaux d'
hr: komadiča, komadići, komadići od, hrskavi komadići, hrskavi komadići od, komata, komadić, listići, posip
hu: darabok, darabolt, darab, darabka
it: pezzi, in pezzi, a pezzi, pezzi di, pezzi d'
nl: stukjes
pl: kawałki, kawałki z, rozdrobniony, rozdrobnione, rozdrobniona
pt: pedaço, pedaços
ro: bucățele, bucățele de, bucăți
sl: kosmiči
sv: bitar, i bitar
uk: шматочки, шматки

en: crumb, crumbs
bg: мръсница, мръсници
ca: mig, miques
cs: drob, droby
da: brødkrumme, brødkrummer
de: Brösel
es: migaja, migajas
fr: miette, miettes
hr: mrvica, mrvica od, mrvice
hu: zsemlemorzsa, zsemlemorzsák
it: briciola, briciole
ja: パン粉
mk: ломка, ломки
nb: brødrasp, brødraspet
nl: kruimel, kruimels
pl: bułka tarta, bułki tarte
pt: migalha, migalhas
sk: drob, droby
sv: brödsmulor

en: peeling
fr: brisures
nl: schilfers
pt: descadado, descamada

en: flakes
bg: люспи, люспи от
ca: flocs, flocs de, flocs d'
cs: vločky
de: Flocken
es: escamas de
fi: hiutaleet, hiutale
fr: flocons de, en flocons
hr: pahuljice, pahuljice od
it: fiocchi di, fiocchi d'
ja: フレーク
nl: vlokken
pl: płatki, grys, wiórki
pt: floco, flocos, em floco, em flocos, floco de, flocos de
sv: flingor, flakes
uk: пластівці

en: chips, slices
cs: lupínky, lupínků
de: chipsstücke
es: copos de
fi: lastu
fr: chips de
it: fettine di
ja: チップス, チップ
nl: chips
pl: chipsy, płaty, płaty z, płaty z, chipsy z, chipsów

de: raspel, raspeln
fi: raaste

en: grits
de: schrot, grieß
fi: rouhe
nl: gries, grits, grut
sv: färs

en: powder, powdered, in powder
af: poeier
ar: مسحوق
be: парашок
bg: Прах, на прах
bn: গুড়া
bs: u prahu
ca: en pols, polvo de, pols de, pols d'
cs: prášek
cy: powdwr
da: pulver
de: pulver, pulverisiert, pulverisierte, pulverisierter, pulverisiertes, gepulvert, gepulverte, gepulverter, gepulvertes
el: σκόνη, σε σκόνη
eo: pulvoro, pulvorigita
es: en polvo, polvo de
et: pulber
fa: پودر
fi: jauhe, jauhetta
fr: en poudre, poudre de, poudre d', semoule de, semoule d', semoule, en semoule, poudre, à base de poudre de, poudres de
he: אבקה, אבקת
hi: चूर्ण, पाउडर
hr: prah, prah od, praha, prahu, u prahu
ht: Poud
hu: porított, por
id: Bubuk
io: Polvo
is: duft, urduft
it: in polvere, en polvere, polvere di, polvere d'
ja: パウダー, 粉末, 末, 粉末状
jv: Bubuk
ko: 가루, 분
lt: milteliai
lv: pulveris
mk: прав
ms: serbuk
nb: pulver, pulverisert
nl: poeder, poeders, in poedervorm
pl: w proszku, proszek, proszek z, sproszkowany, sproszkowane, sproszkowana, sproszkowanych, sproszkowanej
pt: em pó, pó de, en polvo
ro: praf, praf de, pudră, pudră de, Pulbere
ru: сухие, порошок
sk: v prahu, sušená
sl: v prahu
sq: pluhur
sr: прах
sv: pulver
te: పొడి
tr: pudra, tozu
uk: порошок
vi: Bột
yi: שטויב
zh: 粉末

en: soluble powder
fr: poudre soluble, en poudre soluble, poudre soluble de

en: flour, bran, middlings, feed
bg: брашно, брашно от
ca: Farina d'
cs: mouka, mouka z
da: mel
de: mehl
el: αλεύρι, Άλευρο
eo: faruno
es: harina de
et: jahu
fr: Farine de
he: קמח אורז
hr: brašno, posije, prekrupa
hu: liszt
is: mjöl
it: farina di, farina d'
ja: フラワー
lt: miltai, miltų
lv: milti
nb: mel
nl: bloem, meel
no: mel
pl: mąka, mączka, mąka z, mączka z
pt: farinha de
ro: făină de
ru: мука, Мука из
sk: múka
sl: moka
sr: пиринчано брашно
sv: mjöl
th: แป้ง
uk: борошно, висівки

en: split, broken
bg: разделен, разделена, разделено, разделени
ca: partit, partida, partits, partides
cs: rozdělený, rozdělená, rozdělené, rozdělení
es: partido, partida, partidos, partidas
pl: łamane, łamana, łamany
pt: partido, partida, partidos, partidas

en: boned
bg: обезкостен, обезкостено, обезкостена, обезкостени, без кокал
ca: desossat, desossats, desossada, desossades, sense os
es: deshuesado, deshuesada, deshuesados, deshuesadas, sin hueso
fr: désossé, désossée, désossés, désossées, sans os
hr: iskošteno, bez kosti, bez kožice, bez kože
hu: csontozott, kicsontozott
it: disossato, disossata, disossati, disossate
pl: bez kości
pt: desensoçado, desossado, sem osso

en: boned and skinned
bg: без кости и кожа
ca: sense os i pell
cs: bez kostí a kůže
da: uden ben og skind
de: entbeint und gehäutet
el: χωρίς κόκαλα και φλούδα
es: sin hueso y piel
et: luustik ja nahk eemaldatud
fi: luuton ja nahaton
fr: désossé et épluché
he: ללא עצם וקליפה
hr: bez kosti i kože
hu: csontozott és hámozott
is: án beins og húðar
it: disossato e spellato
ja: 骨と皮を取り除いた
lt: be kaulo ir odos
lv: bez kauliem un mizas
nb: uten ben og skinn
nl: ontbeend en ontveld
pl: bez kości i skóry
pt: sem osso e pele
ro: fără os și piele
ru: без костей и кожи
sk: bez kostí a kože
sl: brez kosti in kože
sr: bez kostiju i kože
sv: benfri och skinnfri
th: ไม่มีกระดูกและเปลือก
zh: 去骨去皮

en: machine boned
hr: strojno otkošteno
it: disossato meccanicamente

en: peeled or shelled
de: geschält, geschälte, geschälter, geschälten, geschältes
sv: skalad, skalat, skalade, utan skal

en: unpeeled or unshelled
de: ungeschält, ungeschälte, ungeschälter, ungeschältes
sv: med skal, oskalad, oskalat, oskalade

en: peeled, hulled
bg: обелен, обелено, обелена, обелени, белен, белена, белено, белени, грухана
ca: sense pell
da: skrællet, skrællede, uden skræl
es: sin piel, repelada, repelado, repeladas, repelados, descascarrillado, descascarrillada, descascarrillados, descascarrilladas, descascarilladas
fi: kuoritut
fr: pelé, pelée, pelés, pelées, dépelliculé, dépelliculées
hr: oguljene
hu: hámozott
it: pelato, pelati, pelata, pelate
nl: gepeld, gepelde
pl: obrany, obrana, obrane
pt: pelado, pelada, pelados, peladas, sem pele, sem peles
uk: чищений, чищена, чищене, чищені

en: shelled
ca: sense closca, pelat, pelats, pelada, pelades
cs: loupaná
da: afskallet, afskallede, uden skal
es: sin cascara, pelada, pelado, peladas, pelados
fi: kuoreton, kuorettomat
fr: décortiqué, décortiquée, décortiqués, décortiquées, décoquillé, décoquillée, décoquillés, décoquillées, émondé, émondée, émondés, émondées
hr: oljuštene, oljušteni, golice, bez opne
it: decorticato, decorticati, decorticata, decorticate, sbucciati, sgusciato, sgusciati, sgusciata, sgusciate
pl: łuskany, łuskana, łuskane, obłuskany, obłuskana, obłuskane
pt: descascado, descascada, descascados, descascadas, sem casca, sem cascas
uk: лущений, лущена, лущене, лущені